Florida, session 2026, SB1306.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSection 624.341, Florida Statutes, is created to 32 read: 33 624.341âAuthority of Department of Law Enforcement to 34 accept fingerprints of, and exchange criminal history records 35 with respect to, certain persons applying to the Office of 36 Insurance Regulation.â 37 (1)âThe Legislature finds that criminal activity of 38 insurers poses a particular danger to the residents of this 39 state. Floridians rely, in good faith, on the honest conduct of 40 those who issue and manage insurance policies and other 41 insurance instruments in this state. To safeguard this stateâs 42 residents, the Legislature finds it necessary to ensure that 43 incorporators, subscribers, officers, employees, contractors, 44 stockholders, directors, owners, members, managers, or 45 volunteers involved in the organization, operation, or 46 management of any insurer authorized to sell insurance in this 47 state do not have a criminal background. 48 (2)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall accept and 49 process fingerprints of incorporators, subscribers, officers, 50 employees, contractors, stockholders, directors, owners, 51 members, managers, or volunteers involved in the organization, 52 operation, or management of: 53 (a)âAny insurer or proposed insurer transacting or 54 proposing to transact insurance in this state. 55 (b)âAny entity that is eligible to be examined or 56 investigated under s. 624.316. 57 (3)âEach person required to submit fingerprints to the 58 office must provide a full set of fingerprints to the office or 59 to a vendor, entity, or agency authorized under s. 943.053(13). 60 The office, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward the 61 fingerprints to the department for state processing, and the 62 department shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau 63 of Investigation for national processing as provided in s. 64 624.34. Fees for state and federal fingerprint processing must 65 be borne by the person submitting the fingerprints. The state 66 cost for fingerprint processing is as provided in s. 67 943.053(3)(e). 68 (4)âThe department may, to the extent authorized by federal 69 law, exchange any state or federal criminal history records with 70 the office for the purpose of issuance or continuation of a 71 certificate of authority, certification, or license to operate 72 in this state. 73 (5)âFingerprints must be submitted in accordance with rules 74 adopted by the commission. 75 (a)âFingerprints may be submitted through a third-party 76 vendor authorized by the department. 77 (b)âThe department shall conduct the state criminal history 78 background check, and a federal criminal history background 79 check shall be conducted through the Federal Bureau of 80 Investigation. 81 (c)âAll fingerprints submitted to the department must be 82 submitted and entered into the statewide automated biometric 83 identification system established in s. 943.05(2)(b) and 84 available for use in accordance with s. 943.05(2)(g) and (h). 85 (d)âThe costs of fingerprint processing, including the cost 86 of retaining the fingerprints, must be borne by the person 87 subject to the background checks. 88 (e)âThe office shall review the results of the state and 89 federal criminal history background checks and determine whether 90 the applicant meets the requirements for the certificate of 91 authority, certification, or license to operate in this state. 92 (6)âState criminal history records obtained through the 93 department, federal criminal history records obtained through 94 the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and local criminal history 95 records obtained through local law enforcement agencies must be 96 used by the office for the purpose of issuance, denial, 97 suspension, or revocation of certificates of authority, 98 certifications, or licenses issued to operate in this state. 99 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.